Utah statutes.
59-7-528.   Failure to make return or supply information -- Penalty.
Each officer or employee of any corporation, who, without fraudulent intent,
fails to make, render, sign, or verify any return, or to supply any
information within the time required by or under the provisions of this
chapter, shall be liable for a penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401,
assessed and collected by the commission in the same manner as is provided in
this chapter with regard to delinquent taxes.
